Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.575

Liability.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 7.105.460, this chapter does not impose criminal or civil liability on any person or entity for acts or omissions related to obtaining an extreme risk protection order or a temporary extreme risk protection order including, but not limited to, reporting, declining to report, investigating, declining to investigate, filing, or declining to file a petition under this chapter.

(2) No law enforcement officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest under RCW 7.105.450 if the officer acts in good faith.

[ 2021 c 215 s 70.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.